District of Columbia statutes.
7-3003

Establishment of the Drug Treatment Choice Program; purpose.

There is established the Drug Treatment Choice Program (“Program”). The purpose of the Program is to provide District residents with access to substance abuse rehabilitation and aftercare plans at the treatment provider of their choice in consultation with a qualified substance abuse counselor, and subject to the availability of funds in the Addiction Recovery Fund.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 4, 47 DCR 4350
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Choice in Drug Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-280, January 29, 2008, 55 DCR 1534).
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-142 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“(3) Ensuring that ATR achieves the projected target of serving over 11,000 individuals.”
“(2) Collaborating with federal and local agencies in regard to individuals returning to the community after being incarcerated who require substance abuse treatment or recovery support services; and
“(1) Community outreach and education;
“(b) The duty of APRA to administer ATR shall include:
“(a) There is established the Access to Recovery Voucher Program (’ATR’), which shall be administered by APRA. The purpose of ATR shall be to provide District residents with access to culturally sensitive, substance abuse treatment and recovery support services for the duration of the 3-year federal Access to Recovery grant awarded to APRA and to serve as an addition and complement to the Choice in Drug Treatment Program, established by section 4.
“Sec. 4a. Establishment of the Access to Recovery Voucher Program.
Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 17-142 added a section to read as follows:
This section is referenced in § 7-3003.01.